Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 5. Coal Surface Mining Reclamation Fund.

§ 45.2-1043.
Coal Surface Mining Reclamation Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Coal Surface Mining Reclamation Fund, referred to in this article as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All payments made into the Fund in accordance with the provisions of this article shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this article. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

History.

1982, c. 334, § 45.1-270.1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1044.
Participation in Fund.

Participation in the Fund is open to any operator applying for a permit under this chapter who can demonstrate to the Director a history of at least three consecutive years of compliance under this chapter or any other comparable state or federal act.

Participation in the Fund is optional as to each permit application, and approval of such participation by the Division, upon payment by the operator of all entrance fees to the Fund required by this article, shall constitute compliance with all requirements of §

45.2-1016

and regulations issued pursuant thereto. Such participation shall relieve the operator of all bonding requirements except those set forth in this article. Nothing in this article shall preclude compliance with §

45.2-1016

in lieu of participation in the Fund, prior to commencement of such participation. Commencement of participation in the Fund, as to the applicable permit, constitutes an irrevocable commitment to participate therein as to the applicable permit and for the duration of the coal surface mining operations covered thereunder.

For any mining operation bonded under this article, the total cumulative amount of exposed highwall shall not exceed 1,500 linear feet. The width of the coal pit shall be limited to two mining cuts or 500 feet, whichever is less, measured perpendicular from the most advanced highwall to the coal outcrop or to the nearest point of rough backfilling and grading.

The Director may allow extended distances for rough backfilling and grading beyond those established in this section the applicant (i) can demonstrate to the Director a history of at least seven consecutive years of compliance with this chapter or with any other comparable state or federal act or (ii) submits a bond for the proposed additional area. The additional bond shall be equal to the ratio of the extended distance to the distance specified in subsection C, multiplied by an approved cost estimate of reclamation prepared for the permit.

History.

1982, c. 334, § 45.1-270.2; 1983, c. 131; 1989, c. 432; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1045.
Initial payments into Fund; renewal payments; bonds.

Any operator filing a permit application for a coal surface mining operation participating in the pool fund shall pay into the Fund, as an entrance fee, a sum equal to $1,000 for each applicable permit application. An entrance fee of $5,000 shall be required of each operator who elects to participate in the Fund if the Director has determined that the total balance of the Fund is less than $1.75 million. The entrance fee shall be reduced to $1,000 when the total Fund balance is greater than $2 million. A renewal fee of $1,000 shall be required of each permittee in the Fund at permit renewal.

For the purposes of this section, all planned expenditures shall be deducted from the balance of the Fund during each calendar quarter, including any forfeiture on which engineering cost estimates have been prepared but no money from the Fund has actually been expended.

If the actual expenditures from the Fund are less than the engineering cost estimate, the difference shall be credited to the balance of the Fund during the calendar quarter in which the final expenditure is made from the Fund to accomplish the reclamation.

In addition to the initial payments into the Fund described in subsection A, every operator who participates in the Fund shall furnish to the Fund a bond that meets the criteria of §

45.2-1016

and regulations issued pursuant thereto as follows:

For an underground mining operation participating in the Fund prior to July 1, 1991, the amount of $1,000 per acre covered by each permit. In no event shall such total bond be less than $40,000, except that on a permit that has completed all mining and for which a completion report was approved prior to July 1, 1991, the total bond shall not be less than $10,000.

For an underground mining operation entering the Fund on or after July 1, 1991, and for any additional acreage bonded after such date, the amount of $3,000 per acre. In no event shall the total bond for such underground operation entering the Fund on or after July 1, 1991, be less than $40,000.

For any other coal mining operation participating in the Fund prior to July 1, 1991, the amount of $1,500 per acre covered by each permit. In no event shall such total bond be less than $100,000, except that on a permit that has completed all mining and for which a completion report was approved prior to July 1, 1991, the total bond shall not be less than $25,000.

For any other coal mining operation entering the Fund on or after July 1, 1991, and for any additional acreage bonded after such date, the amount of $3,000 per acre. In no event shall the total bond for such operation entering the Fund on or after July 1, 1991, be less than $100,000.

All fees and payments provided in this article shall be in addition to initial permit application and anniversary payments provided pursuant to §

45.2-1010

or any other payments required in compliance with this chapter.

Each Fund participant shall be allowed to post incremental bonds as set forth in §

45.2-1016

. Such bonds shall be posted in annual increments according to a schedule contained in the permit application and approved annually by the Director on the anniversary date.

Any mining operation participating in the Fund that has been in temporary cessation for more than six months as of July 1, 1991, shall within 90 days of that date post bond equal to the total estimated cost of reclamation for all portions of the permitted site that are in temporary cessation. Any mining operation participating in the Fund that has been in temporary cessation for six months or less as of July 1, 1991, shall within 90 days after the date on which the operation has been in temporary cessation for more than six months post bond equal to the total estimated cost of reclamation for all portions of the permitted site that are in temporary cessation. Any mining operation participating in the Fund that enters temporary cessation on or after July 1, 1991, shall, prior to the date on which the operation has been in temporary cessation for more than six months, post bond equal to the total estimated cost of reclamation for all portions of the permitted site that are in temporary cessation. Such bond shall remain in effect throughout the remainder of the period during which the site is in temporary cessation. At such time as the site returns to active status, the bond posted under this subsection may be released if the permittee has posted bond pursuant to subsection B.

History.

1982, c. 334, § 45.1-270.3; 1983, c. 131; 1989, c. 432; 1991, c. 495; 2014, cc. 111, 135; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1046.
Assessment of reclamation tax revenues for Fund.

There is hereby levied a reclamation tax upon the production of coal by each operator participating in the Fund under a permit issued under this chapter as set forth in this article.

Thirty days after the end of each calendar quarter during which the total balance of the Fund, including interest thereon, is less than $20 million, each operator shall pay into the Fund an amount equal to:

Four cents per clean ton of coal produced by a surface mining operation permitted under this chapter;

Three cents per clean ton of coal produced by a deep mining operation permitted under this chapter; and

One and one-half cents per clean ton of coal processed or loaded by a preparation or loading facility permitted under this chapter.

At the end of each calendar quarter during which the total balance in the Fund, including interest thereon, exceeds $20 million, payments under this section shall cease until again required pursuant to subsection B.

In no event shall any operator pay reclamation tax under this section on total coal production in excess of five million tons per calendar year, regardless of the number of permits held by that operator. In no event shall any operator holding more than one type of permit pay tax at a rate in excess of five and one-half cents per ton on coal originally surface-mined by that operator or in excess of four and one-half cents per ton on coal originally deep-mined by that operator. Any operator holding one permit upon which coal is mined and processed or loaded shall pay only the tax applicable under this section to the surface mining operation or deep mining operation.

History.

1982, c. 334, § 45.1-270.4; 1983, c. 131; 1987, c. 468; 1991, c. 495; 2014, cc. 111, 135; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 111 and 135, cl. 2, which provided for a July 1, 2017, expiration date for amendments to this section, was repealed by Acts 2017, c. 7. Amendments by Acts 2014, cc. 111 and 135, will not expire.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1047.
Special assessment.

In addition to the tax assessed pursuant to §

45.2-1046

, and in order to ensure Fund solvency, the Director of the Division shall require each permittee to pay any special assessment made pursuant to subsection B.

On and after July 1, 1990, the Director of the Division shall assess each permit in the Fund the amount of $500. Such assessment shall be made only one time and all revenues collected shall be applied to the balance of the Fund. The permittee shall be responsible for payment of the assessment.

On or after July 1, 1991, the Director of the Division shall assess an amount not to exceed $500,000. The amount of the assessment shall be $250 for each permit participating in the Fund that has completed all mining activity and for which a completion report has been approved. The remaining assessments shall be made in equal amounts per acre for each disturbed acre permitted under the Fund. The amount of disturbed acreage for each permit shall be determined by the most recent anniversary map, or updated anniversary map, submitted by the permittee to the Division prior to July 1, 1991. The assessments under subsection B and this subsection shall not apply to acreage that has been reclaimed and for which an increment of the bond has been transferred to other acreage in the permit. The assessments under subsection B and this subsection shall be made only one time and all revenues collected shall be applied to the balance of the Fund. The permittee shall be responsible for payment of the assessment.

Failure to tender moneys assessed pursuant to the provisions of this section within 30 calendar days of assessment shall constitute a violation of this chapter. Any civil penalties collected for violations of this section shall be applied to the balance of the Fund.

History.

1990, c. 427, § 45.1-270.4:1; 1991, c. 495; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, amended § 45.1-270.4:1 from which this section is derived. Since the amendments had already been incorporated in this section by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, the amendments by c. 532 were not give effect.

§ 45.2-1048.
Collection of reclamation tax and penalties for nonpayment.

Payment of taxes under this section shall be made no later than 30 days after the end of each calendar quarter when taxes are applicable in accordance with §

45.2-1046

. The Division shall notify each operator holding a permit under this chapter of those periods during which the taxes are applicable, provide forms for reporting coal production figures subject to taxes, and collect all taxes for the Fund.

Pursuant to regulations adopted by the Director, and consistent with the provisions of §

45.2-1024

, all funds paid into the Fund, and interest accrued to the Fund, shall be available for the completion of defaulted reclamation plans filed pursuant to §

45.2-1011

. From the interest accrued to the Fund, amounts sufficient to properly administer the Fund are hereby appropriated to the Division. The Director shall also adopt regulations for the implementation of this article and for the collection of taxes hereunder.

The Division, upon advance written request to an operator, may audit the relevant books and records of the operator upon which taxes paid under this section are based. Failure to consent to a reasonable request for the audit shall be deemed a violation of this article by the operator.

Upon the failure of an operator to pay taxes when due under this section, the Division shall issue a notice of violation pursuant to subsection B of §

45.2-1020

. The notice of violation shall state that upon failure of payment within 15 days thereafter, the Division shall issue a cessation order to the operator for failure to abate the notice of violation. Upon the issuance of the cessation order pursuant to subsection C of §

45.2-1020

, the enforcement procedures set forth in Article 2 (§

45.2-1008

et seq.) shall apply. Civil penalties imposed upon an operator pursuant to a violation of this article shall be placed in the Fund.

History.

1982, c. 334, § 45.1-270.5; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1049.
Forfeiture of bonds on operations participating in the Fund; alternative remedies.

Forfeiture of bonds of an operation participating in the Fund shall be accomplished as set forth in §

45.2-1023

and the regulations adopted by the Director.

In addition to forfeiture, the Director may proceed against the permittee of a surface coal mining operation under the provisions of subsection F of §

45.2-1020

by filing a civil action for injunctive or other relief in any court of competent jurisdiction to compel the permittee to perform the reclamation work in full compliance with this chapter, the regulations, and approved permit plans. Any injunctive relief shall be granted without the necessity of pleading or proving inadequate remedy at law or irreparable harm, and no bond shall be required.

Proceedings under either subsection A or B shall not constitute a waiver by the Director to proceed under the other subsection, nor shall the commencement of action under one subsection constitute an election to proceed solely under that subsection.

History.

1987, c. 468, § 45.1-270.5:1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1050.
Reinstatement to the Fund; recovery of Fund expenditures.

An operator who has defaulted on any reclamation obligation and has thereby caused the Fund to incur reclamation expenses shall not be eligible to participate in the Fund thereafter until restitution for such default has been made. Compliance with this requirement shall be a prerequisite to the filing by the operator of any new permit application under this chapter but shall not affect the operator’s obligation to comply with all other requirements of this chapter in applying for a permit.

The Director may file a motion for judgment in any court of competent jurisdiction against the permittee to recover all moneys expended by the Fund to accomplish a reclamation. Such expenditures shall include construction costs, engineering costs, administrative costs, and legal costs. In any action to recover such costs, the defendant shall not relitigate the facts giving rise to the forfeiture or defend by claiming the forfeiture was improper.

History.

1982, c. 334, § 45.1-270.6; 1987, c. 468; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1051.
Coal Surface Mining Reclamation Fund Advisory Board.

The Coal Surface Mining Reclamation Fund Advisory Board (the Advisory Board) is established as an advisory board in the executive branch of state government. The purpose of the Advisory Board is to formulate recommendations for the Director concerning oversight of the general operation of the Fund.

The Advisory Board shall have a total membership of eight members that shall consist of seven nonlegislative citizen members and one ex officio member. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by the General Assembly as follows: at least four shall represent the coal industry, one shall be a representative of the Director, and two shall represent conservation interests and any other public or private interests as are appropriate in accordance with Article V of the Interstate Mining Compact (§

45.2-201

). The Director of the Division or his designee shall serve ex officio with nonvoting privileges and shall serve as Secretary to the Advisory Board. Nonlegislative citizen members of the Advisory Board shall be citizens of the Commonwealth.

The ex officio member of the Advisory Board shall serve a term coincident with his term of office. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The nonlegislative citizen members of the Advisory Board shall be appointed for five-year staggered terms. No person shall serve more than two consecutive terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment.

The Advisory Board shall annually elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership and shall formulate rules for its organization and procedure. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.

The nonlegislative citizen members of the Advisory Board shall serve without compensation or reimbursement for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The Advisory Board shall meet not less than twice each year, with such meetings held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

The Advisory Board shall have the following powers and duties:

Report biannually to the Director and the Governor on the status of the Fund; and

Recommend to the Director regulations or changes to the Fund for the administration or operation of the Fund.

The Department shall provide staff support to the Advisory Board. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Advisory Board, upon request.

The Director may adopt the recommendations of the Advisory Board through regulatory action from time to time in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and otherwise in accordance with law.

The Advisory Board shall serve as the advisory body required by Article V of the Interstate Mining Compact (§

45.2-201

).

History.

1982, c. 334, § 45.1-270.7; 1985, c. 448; 2018, c. 67; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.